Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Ray Davis Safe
Roads Act".
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-101, as
last amended by Section 3, Chapter 330, O.S.L. 2025 (47 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 6-101), is amended to read as follows:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Section 6-101. A. No person, except those hereinafter
expressly exempted in Sections 6-102 and 6-102.1 of this title,
shall operate any motor vehicle upon a highway in this state unless
the person has a valid Oklahoma driver license for the class of
vehicle being operated under the provisions of this title. No
person shall be permitted to possess more than one valid license at
any time, except as provided in paragraph 4 5 of subsection F of
this section.
B. 1. No person shall operate a Class A commercial motor
vehicle unless the person is eighteen (18) years of age or older and
holds a valid Class A commercial license, except as provided in
paragraph 5 of this subsection and subsection F of this section.
Any person holding a valid Class A commercial license shall be
permitted to operate motor vehicles in Classes A, B, C and D, except
as provided for in paragraph 4 of this subsection.
2. No person shall operate a Class B commercial motor vehicle
unless the person is eighteen (18) years of age or older and holds a
valid Class B commercial license, except as provided in paragraph 5
6 of subsection F of this section. Any person holding a valid Class
B commercial license shall be permitted to operate motor vehicles in
Classes B, C and D, except as provided for in paragraph 4 of this
subsection.
3. No person shall operate a Class C commercial motor vehicle
unless the person is eighteen (18) years of age or older and holds a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

vali d Class C commercial license, except as provided in subsection F
of this section. Any person holding a valid Class C commercial
license shall be permitted to operate motor vehicles in Classes C
and D, except as provided for in paragraph 4 of this subsection.
4. No person under twenty-one (21) years of age shall be
licensed to operate any motor vehicle which is required to be
placarded for hazardous materials pursuant to 49 C.F.R., Part 172,
subpart F, except as provided in subsection F of this section;
provided, a person eighteen (18) years of age or older may be
licensed to operate a farm vehicle which is required to be placarded
for hazardous materials pursuant to 49 C.F.R., Part 172, subpart F,
except as provided in subsection F of this section.
5. A person at least seventeen (17) years of age who
successfully completes all examinations required by law may be
issued by Service Oklahoma:
a. a restricted Class A commercial license which shall
grant to the licensee the privilege to operate a Class
A or Class B commercial motor vehicle for harvest
purposes or a Class D motor vehicle, or
b. a restricted Class B commercial license which shall
grant to the licensee the privilege to operate a Class
B commercial motor vehicle for harvest purposes or a
Class D motor vehicle.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

6. No person shall operate a Class D motor vehicle unless the
person is sixteen (16) years of age or older and holds a valid Class
D license, except as provided for in Section 6-102 or 6-105 of this
title. Any person holding a valid Class D license shall be
permitted to operate motor vehicles in Class D only.
C. Any person issued a driver license pursuant to this section
may exercise the privilege thereby granted upon all streets and
highways in this state.
D. No person shall operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle
without having a valid Class A, B, C or D license with a motorcycle
endorsement. Except as otherwise provided by law, any new applicant
for an original driver license shall be required to successfully
complete a written examination, vision examination and driving
examination for a motorcycle as prescribed by the Department of
Public Safety, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma, and a certified
state-approved motorcycle basic rider course approved by the
Department, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma, if the applicant
is seventeen (17) years of age or younger to be eligible for a
motorcycle endorsement thereon. The written examination and driving
examination for a motorcycle shall be waived by Service Oklahoma
upon verification that the person has successfully completed a
certified Motorcycle Safety Foundation rider course approved by the
Department, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

E. Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who lawfully
possesses a valid Oklahoma driver license which is eligible for
renewal shall be required to successfully complete a written
examination, vision examination and driving examination for a
motorcycle as prescribed by the Department, in conjunction with
Service Oklahoma, and a certified state-approved motorcycle basic
rider course approved by the Department, in conjunction with Service
Oklahoma, if the person is seventeen (17) years of age or younger to
be eligible for a motorcycle endorsement. The written examination
and driving examination for a motorcycle shall be waived by Service
Oklahoma upon verification that the person has successfully
completed a certified Motorcycle Safety Foundation rider course
approved by the Department, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma.
F. 1. Any person eighteen (18) years of age or older may apply
for a restricted Class A, B or C commercial learner permit. Service
Oklahoma, after the applicant has passed all parts of the
examination for a Class D license and has successfully passed all
parts of the examination for a Class A, B or C commercial license
other than the driving examination, may issue to the applicant a
commercial learner permit which shall entitle the person having
immediate lawful possession of the commercial learner permit and a
valid Oklahoma driver license or provisional driver license pursuant
to Section 6-212 of this title to operate a Class A, B or C
commercial motor vehicle upon the public highways solely for the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

purp ose of behind-the-wheel training in accordance with rules
promulgated by the Department.
2. This commercial learner permit shall be issued for a period
as provided in Section 6-115 of this title of one (1) year;
provided, such commercial learner permit may be suspended, revoked,
canceled, denied or disqualified at the discretion of the
Department, with notice to Service Oklahoma, for violation of the
restrictions, for failing to give the required or correct
information on the application or for violation of any traffic laws
of this state pertaining to the operation of a motor vehicle.
Except as otherwise provided, the lawful possessor of a commercial
learner permit who has been issued a commercial learner permit for a
minimum of fourteen (14) days may have the restriction requiring an
accompanying driver removed by satisfactorily completing a driver's
examination; provided, the removal of a restriction shall not
authorize the operation of a Class A, B or C commercial motor
vehicle if such operation is otherwise prohibited by law.
3. Service Oklahoma shall not issue an original Class A, B, or
C driver license to any applicant who is disqualified under
paragraph 5 of subsection A of Section 6-103 of this title.
4. No person shall apply for and Service Oklahoma shall not
issue an original Class A, B or C driver license until the person
has been issued a commercial learner permit and held the permit for
at least fourteen (14) days. Any person who currently holds a Class
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B or C license and who wishes to apply for another class of
commercial driver license shall be required to apply for a
commercial learner permit and to hold the permit for at least
fourteen (14) days before applying for the Class A or B license, as
applicable. Any person who currently holds a Class A, B or C
license and who wishes to add an endorsement or remove a restriction
for which a skills examination is required shall be required to
apply for a commercial learner permit and to hold the permit for at
least fourteen (14) days before applying for the endorsement.
4. 5. A commercial learner permit shall be issued by Service
Oklahoma as a separate and unique document which shall be valid only
in conjunction with a valid Oklahoma driver license or provisional
driver license pursuant to Section 6-212 of this title, both of
which shall be in the possession of the person to whom they have
been issued whenever that person is operating a commercial motor
vehicle as provided in this subsection.
5. 6. After one renewal of a commercial learner permit, as
provided in paragraph 2 of this subsection, a commercial permit
shall not be renewed again. Any person who has held a commercial
learner permit for the initial issuance period and one renewal
period shall not be eligible for and Service Oklahoma shall not
issue another renewal of the permit; provided, the person may
reapply for a new commercial learner permit, as provided for in this
subsection.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

G. 1. For purposes of this title:
a. "REAL ID Compliant Driver License" or "Identification
Card" means a driver license or identification card
issued by this state that has been certified by the
United States Department of Homeland Security (USDHS)
as compliant with the requirements of the REAL ID Act
of 2005, Public Law No. 109-13. A REAL ID Compliant
Driver License or Identification Card and the process
through which it is issued incorporate a variety of
security measures designed to protect the integrity
and trustworthiness of the license or card. A REAL ID
Compliant Driver License or Identification Card will
be clearly marked on the face indicating that it is a
compliant document, and
b. "REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License" or
"Identification Card" means a driver license or
identification card issued by this state that has not
been certified by the United States Department of
Homeland Security (USDHS) as being compliant with the
requirements of the REAL ID Act of 2005. A REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card
will be clearly marked on the face indicating that it
is not compliant with the federal REAL ID Act of 2005
and is not acceptable for official federal purposes.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

The driver license or identification card will have a
unique design or color indicator that clearly
distinguishes it from a compliant license or card.
2. Original Driver License and Identification Card Issuance:
a. Application for an original REAL ID Compliant or REAL
ID Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card
shall be made to Service Oklahoma or a licensed
operator provided such licensed operator is authorized
to process application for REAL ID Compliant Driver
Licenses and Identification Cards. Application for a
REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or Identification
Card shall be made to Service Oklahoma.
b. Service Oklahoma employees or authorized licensed
operators shall perform all document recognition and
other requirements needed for approval of an original
REAL ID Compliant Driver License or Identification
Card application. Service Oklahoma employees shall
perform all document recognition and other
requirements needed for approval of a REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card
application.
c. Upon approval of an original REAL ID Compliant or REAL
ID Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card
application, the applicant may take the approved
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

application document to a licensed operator to receive
a temporary driver license or identification card.
d. The licensed operator shall process the approved REAL
ID Compliant or REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or
Identification Card application and upon payment shall
provide the applicant a temporary driver license or
identification card. A temporary driver license or
identification card shall afford the holder the
privileges otherwise granted by the specific class of
driver license or identification card for the period
of time listed on the temporary driver license or
identification card or the period of time prior to the
applicant receiving a REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card,
whichever time period is shorter.
3. REAL ID Compliant Driver License and Identification Card
Renewal and Replacement:
a. Application for renewal or replacement of a REAL ID
Compliant Driver License or Identification Card may be
made to Service Oklahoma or to a licensed operator;
provided, such licensed operator is authorized to
process application for REAL ID Compliant Driver
Licenses and Identification Cards. A licensed
operator may process the voluntary downgrade of a REAL
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

ID Compliant Commercial Driver License to any lower
class license upon request of the licensee; provided,
no additional endorsements or restrictions are placed
on the license.
b. Service Oklahoma employees or authorized licensed
operators shall perform all document recognition and
other requirements needed for approval of a renewal or
replacement REAL ID Compliant Driver License or
Identification Card application.
c. Upon approval of a renewal or replacement REAL ID
Compliant Driver License or Identification Card
application, the applicant may receive a temporary
driver license or identification card from Service
Oklahoma or an authorized licensed operator.
d. A temporary driver license or identification card
acquired under the provisions of this paragraph shall
afford the holder the privileges otherwise granted by
the specific class of driver license or identification
card being renewed or replaced for the period of time
listed on the temporary driver license or
identification card or the period of time prior to the
applicant receiving a REAL ID Compliant Driver License
or Identification Card, whichever time period is
shorter.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

e. For purposes of this title, an application for a REAL
ID Compliant Driver License or Identification Card by
an individual with a valid Oklahoma-issued driver
license or identification card shall be considered a
renewal of a REAL ID Compliant Driver License or
Identification Card.
4. REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License and Identification Card
Renewal and Replacement:
a. Application for renewal or replacement of a REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card may
be made to Service Oklahoma or to a licensed operator.
A licensed operator may process the voluntary
downgrade of a REAL ID Noncompliant Commercial Driver
License to any lower class license upon request of the
licensee; provided, no additional endorsements or
restrictions are added to the license.
b. Service Oklahoma employees or licensed operators shall
perform all document recognition and other
requirements needed for approval of a renewal or
replacement REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or
Identification Card application.
c. Upon approval of a renewal or replacement REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card
application, the applicant may receive a temporary
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

driver license or identification card from Service
Oklahoma or a licensed operator.
d. A temporary driver license or identification card
acquired under the provisions of this paragraph shall
afford the holder the privileges otherwise granted by
the specific class of driver license or identification
card being renewed or replaced for the period of time
listed on the temporary driver license or
identification card or the period of time prior to the
applicant receiving a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver
License or Identification Card, whichever time period
is shorter.
H. 1. The fee charged for an approved application for an
original Oklahoma REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID Noncompliant Driver
License or an approved application for the addition of an
endorsement to a current valid Oklahoma REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License shall be assessed in accordance with the
following schedule:
Class A Commercial Learner
Permit $25.00
Class A Commercial License $25.00
Class B Commercial Learner
Permit $15.00
Class B Commercial License $15.00
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Class C Commercial Learner
Permit $15.00
Class C Commercial License $15.00
Class D License $ 4.00
Motorcycle Endorsement $ 4.00
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1104 of this
title, all monies collected from the fees charged for Class A, B and
C commercial licenses pursuant to the provisions of this subsection
shall be deposited in the General Revenue Fund of this state.
I. The fee charged for any failed examination shall be Four
Dollars ($4.00) for any license classification. Notwithstanding the
provisions of Section 1104 of this title, all monies collected from
such examination fees pursuant to the provisions of this subsection
shall be deposited in the General Revenue Fund of this state.
J. In addition to any fee charged pursuant to the provisions of
subsection H of this section, the fee charged for the issuance or
renewal of a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License shall be in
accordance with the following schedule; provided, that any applicant
who has a CDL Learner Permit shall be charged only the replacement
fee for the issuance of the license:
License Class 4-year 8-year
Class A Commercial Learner
Permit $56.50 $113.00
Class A Commercial License $56.50 $113.00
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Class B Commercial Learner
Permit $56.50 $113.00
Class B Commercial License $56.50 $113.00
Class C Commercial Learner
Permit $46.50 $93.00
Class C Commercial License $46.50 $93.00
Class D License $38.50 $77.00
K. In addition to any fee charged pursuant to the provisions of
subsection H of this section, the fee charged for the issuance or
renewal of a REAL ID Compliant Driver License shall be in accordance
with the following schedule; provided, that any applicant who has a
CDL Learner Permit shall be charged only the replacement fee for the
issuance of the license:
License Class 4-year 8-year
REAL ID Compliant Class A
Commercial Learner Permit $56.50 $113.00
REAL ID Compliant Class A
Commercial License $56.50 $113.00
REAL ID Compliant Class B
Commercial Learner Permit $56.50 $113.00
REAL ID Compliant Class B
Commercial License $56.50 $113.00
REAL ID Compliant Class C
Commercial Learner Permit $46.50 $93.00
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

REAL ID Compliant Class C
Commercial License $46.50 $93.00
REAL ID Compliant Class D
License $38.50 $77.00
L. A commercial learner permit may be renewed one time for a
period of one hundred eighty (180) days. The cost for the renewed
permit shall be the same as for the original permit.
M. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1104 of this
title, of each fee charged pursuant to the provisions of subsections
J, K and L of this section:
1. Five Dollars and fifty cents ($5.50) of a 4-year license or
Eleven Dollars ($11.00) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to
the Trauma Care Assistance Revolving Fund created in Section 1-
2530.9 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Six Dollars and seventy-five cents ($6.75) of a 4-year
license or Thirteen Dollars and fifty cents ($13.50) of an 8-year
license shall be deposited to the Department of Public Safety
Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be used solely for the
purpose of administration and maintenance of the computerized
imaging system of the Department through October 31, 2022.
Beginning November 1, 2022, Six Dollars and seventy-five cents
($6.75) of a 4-year license or Thirteen Dollars and fifty cents
($13.50) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to the Service
Oklahoma Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be used solely
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

for the purpose of administration and maintenance of the
computerized imaging system of Service Oklahoma;
3. Ten Dollars ($10.00) of a 4-year license or Twenty Dollars
($20.00) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to the Department
of Public Safety Revolving Fund for all original or renewal
issuances of licenses through October 31, 2022. Beginning November
1, 2022, Ten Dollars ($10.00) of a 4-year license or Twenty Dollars
($20.00) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to the Service
Oklahoma Revolving Fund for all original or renewal issuances of
licenses; and
4. Five Dollars ($5.00) of a 4-year license or Six Dollars
($6.00) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to the State Public
Safety Fund created in Section 2-147 of this title.
N. All original and renewal driver licenses shall expire as
provided in Section 6-115 of this title.
O. 1. Through May 31, 2025, any person sixty-two (62) to
sixty-four (64) years of age during the calendar year of issuance or
renewal of a Class D license or motorcycle endorsement shall be
charged the following prorated fee:
4-year 8-year
Age 62 $21.25 $42.50
Age 63 $17.50 $35.00
Age 64 $13.75 $27.50

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Any person sixty-five (65) years of age or older during the
calendar year of issuance or renewal of a Class D license or
motorcycle endorsement shall not be charged a fee.
P. No person who has been honorably discharged from active
service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or
Oklahoma National Guard and who has been certified by the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs, its successor or the Armed
Forces of the United States to be a disabled veteran in receipt of
compensation at the one-hundred-percent rate for a permanent
disability sustained through military action or accident resulting
from disease contracted while in such active service and registered
with the veterans registry created by the Oklahoma Department of
Veterans Affairs shall be charged a fee for the issuance,
replacement or renewal of an Oklahoma driver license; provided, that
if a veteran has been previously exempt from a fee pursuant to this
subsection, no registration with the veterans registry shall be
required.
Q. In accordance with the provisions of subsection G of this
section, Service Oklahoma is authorized to promulgate rules for the
issuance and renewal of driver licenses authorized pursuant to the
provisions of Sections 6-101 through 6-309 of this title; provided,
that no such rules applicable to the issuance or renewal of REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver Licenses shall create more stringent standards
than such rules applicable as of January 1, 2017, unless directly
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 18
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

rela ted to a specific change in statutory law concerning standards
for REAL ID Noncompliant Driver Licenses. Applications, upon forms
approved by Service Oklahoma, for such licenses shall be handled, in
accordance with the provisions of subsection G of this section, by
the licensed operator; provided, Service Oklahoma is authorized to
assume these duties in any county of this state. Each licensed
operator accepting applications for driver licenses shall receive
Six Dollars ($6.00) for a 4-year REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License
or Twelve Dollars ($12.00) for an 8-year REAL ID Noncompliant Driver
License or Ten Dollars ($10.00) for a 4-year REAL ID Compliant
Driver License or Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for an 8-year REAL ID
Compliant Driver License to be deducted from the total collected for
each license or renewal application accepted through June 30, 2023.
Beginning July 1, 2022, and ending on June 30, 2023, each motor
license agent or licensed operator accepting applications for driver
licenses for individuals over the age of sixty-five (65) years or
for applications for drivers pursuant to subsection P of this
section shall receive Six Dollars ($6.00) for a 4-year driver
license or Twelve Dollars ($12.00) for an 8-year driver license to
be deducted daily by the motor license agent or licensed operator
receipts. Beginning July 1, 2023, these fees shall be retained by
the licensed operator pursuant to subsection E of Section 1141.1 of
this title. The fees received by the licensed operator, authorized
by this subsection, shall be used for operating expenses. The
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 19
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

amou nt retained pursuant to this subsection shall not be retained by
any state agency. The fees received by the licensed operator,
authorized by this subsection, shall be used for operating expenses.
For purposes of this subsection, "licensed operator" shall mean an
individual who obtains a license from the Service Oklahoma Operator
Board to operate a designated Service Oklahoma location and offers
third-party fulfillment of designated services to be rendered by
Service Oklahoma.
R. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1104 of this title
and subsection Q of this section and except as provided in
subsections H and M of this section, the first Sixty Thousand
Dollars ($60,000.00) of all monies collected pursuant to this
section shall be paid by the Oklahoma Tax Commission to the State
Treasurer to be deposited in the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury.
The next Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) of monies
collected pursuant to this section shall be paid by the Tax
Commission to the State Treasurer to be deposited each fiscal year
under the provisions of this section to the credit of the Department
of Public Safety Restricted Revolving Fund for the purpose of the
Oklahoma Law Enforcement Telecommunications System. All other
monies collected in excess of Five Hundred Sixty Thousand Dollars
($560,000.00) each fiscal year shall be apportioned as provided in

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 20
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Sect ion 1104 of this title, except as otherwise provided in this
section.
S. Service Oklahoma shall retain the images displayed on
licenses and identification cards issued pursuant to the provisions
of Sections 6-101 through 6-309 of this title which may be used
only:
1. By a law enforcement agency for purposes of criminal
investigations, missing person investigations or any law enforcement
purpose which is deemed necessary by the Commissioner of Public
Safety;
2. By the driver licensing agency of another state for its
official purpose; and
3. As provided in Section 2-110 of this title.
All agencies approved by the Oklahoma Law Enforcement
Telecommunications System (OLETS) or the National Law Enforcement
Telecommunications System (NLETS) to receive photographs or
computerized images may obtain them through OLETS or through NLETS.
Photographs or computerized images may be obtained by law
enforcement one inquiry at a time.
The computer system and related equipment acquired for this
purpose must conform to industry standards for interoperability and
open architecture. The Department of Public Safety may promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 21
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

T. No person may hold more than one state-issued or territory-
issued driver license or identification card from Oklahoma or any
other state or territory. Service Oklahoma shall not issue a driver
license to a person who has been previously issued a driver license
or identification card until such license or identification card has
been surrendered to Service Oklahoma by the applicant. Provided,
any person who holds both a driver license and identification card
from Oklahoma as of November 1, 2025, may continue to possess both
credentials until the first expiration of either credential. At
that time, the person shall be allowed to retain, replace, or renew
either the driver license or identification card and shall surrender
the second credential to Service Oklahoma. Service Oklahoma may
promulgate rules related to the issuance of replacement REAL ID
Compliant Driver Licenses in the event of loss or theft.
U. Beginning May 24, 2021, and ending on June 30, 2023, in
addition to the amounts provided in subsection Q of this section, a
licensed operator shall receive Five Dollars ($5.00) for each
processed application for a REAL ID Compliant 4-year Driver License
and Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each processed application for a REAL
ID Compliant 8-year Driver License. Any additional amounts provided
pursuant to this subsection shall not be retained by Service
Oklahoma.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 22
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-103, as
amended by Section 40, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 6-103), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-103. A. Except as otherwise provided by law, Service
Oklahoma shall not issue a driver license to:
1. Any person who is under eighteen (18) years of age, except
that Service Oklahoma may issue a Class D license to any person who
attains sixteen (16) years of age on or after August 15, 2000, and
meets the requirements of Sections 6-105 and 6-107.3 of this title;
2. Any unemancipated person who is under eighteen (18) years of
age and whose custodial legal parent or legal guardian does not
approve the issuance of a license as required by Section 6-110.2 of
this title or objects to the issuance of a license or permit by
filing an objection pursuant to Section 6-103.1 of this title;
3. Any person whose driving privilege has been suspended,
revoked, canceled or denied in this state or any other state or
country until the driving privilege has been reinstated by the state
or country withdrawing the privilege;
4. Any person who is classified as an excessive user of
alcohol, any other intoxicating substance, or a combination of
alcohol and any other intoxicating substance, and inimical to public
safety, in accordance with rules promulgated by the Department,
until all requirements granting or reinstating driving privileges
are met, including, but not limited to, abstinence from the use of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 23
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

alco hol, any other intoxicating substance, or any combination of
alcohol and any other intoxicating substance for a minimum of either
twelve (12) months or eighteen (18) months, as determined by OAC
595:10-5, immediately preceding application for or application for
reinstatement of driving privileges;
5. Any applicant for a Class A, B, or C commercial driver
license whose name appears on the methamphetamine offender registry
maintained pursuant to Section 2-701 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes. Prior to the issuance of a commercial driver license,
Service Oklahoma shall verify, via a data match or other appropriate
means, that the applicant is not on the registry;
6. Any person who is required by Section 6-101 et seq. of this
title to take an examination, unless the person shall have
successfully passed the examination;
6. 7. Any person who is required under the laws of this state
to deposit proof of financial responsibility and who has not
deposited such proof;
7. 8. Any person who is physically deformed or who is afflicted
with any mental disease or physical condition that would impair the
driving ability of the person or when the Commissioner of Public
Safety, from information concerning the person or from the records
and reports on file in the Department of Public Safety, determines
that the operation of a motor vehicle by such person on the highways
would be inimical to public safety or welfare;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 24
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

8. 9. Any person who is a nonresident, as defined in Section 1-
137 of this title;
9. 10. Any alien unless such person presents valid
documentation of identity and authorization for presence in the
United States issued pursuant to the laws of the United States;
provided, no license shall be issued to any alien whose
documentation indicates the alien is a visitor or is not eligible to
establish residency; or
10. 11. Any person who possesses a valid license to operate a
motor vehicle issued by another state until the other state license
has been surrendered.
B. Any applicant who is denied a license under the provisions
of subsection A of this section shall have the right to an appeal as
provided in Section 6-211 of this title.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
April 21, 2026 - DO PASS








SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3304 SFLR Page 25
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)